Vermont statutes. Title 7 Alcoholic Beverages, Cannabis, and Tobacco
Subchapter 2. Retail Licenses and Permits

§ 221.
First-class licenses.

With the approval of the Board of Liquor and Lottery, the control commissioners may grant a first-class license to a retail dealer for the premises where the dealer carries on business if the retail dealer submits an application and pays the fee provided in section 204 of this title and satisfies the Board that the premises:
(a) (1) With the approval of the Board of Liquor and Lottery, the control commissioners may grant a first-class license to a retail dealer for the premises where the dealer carries on business if the retail dealer submits an application and pays the fee provided in section 204 of this title and satisfies the Board that the premises:

are leased, rented, or owned by the retail dealer; and

are devoted primarily to dispensing meals to the public and have adequate and sanitary space and equipment for preparing and serving meals, except in the case of clubs or holders of a manufacturer’s or rectifier’s license.

The Board of Liquor and Lottery may grant a first-class license to a boat or railroad dining car if the person that operates it submits an application and pays the fee provided in section 204 of this title.

The Division shall post notice of pending applications on its website.

A first-class license permits the holder to sell malt and vinous beverages for consumption only on those premises.
(b) (1) A first-class license permits the holder to sell malt and vinous beverages for consumption only on those premises.

Except as otherwise provided pursuant to sections 271 and 278 of this title, a first-class license holder shall purchase all malt beverages and vinous beverages sold pursuant to the license from Vermont wholesale dealers or packagers.

A retail dealer carrying on business in more than one place shall acquire a first-class license for each place where the retail dealer sells malt or vinous beverages for consumption on the premises.

Partially consumed bottles of vinous beverages or specialty beers that were purchased with a meal may be removed from first-class licensed premises, provided the beverages are recapped or resealed.

No person under 18 years of age shall be employed by a first-class licensee as:

a bartender for the purpose of preparing, mixing, or dispensing alcoholic beverages; or

a waitress or waiter for the purpose of serving alcoholic beverages.

A holder of a first-class license may contract with another person to prepare and dispense food on the licensed premises.
(f) (1) A holder of a first-class license may contract with another person to prepare and dispense food on the licensed premises.

The first-class license holder shall provide to the Division written notification five business days prior to the start of the contract that includes the following information:

the name and address of the license holder;

a signed copy of the contract;

the name and address of the person contracted to provide the food;

a copy of the person’s license from the Department of Health for the facility in which food is served; and

the person’s rooms and meals tax certificate from the Department of Taxes.

The holder of the first-class license shall notify the Division within five business days of the termination of the contract to prepare and dispense food. The first-class licensee shall be responsible for controlling all conduct on the premises at all times, including in the area in which the food is prepared and stored.

A hotel that holds a first-class license and places a minibar in any room of a registered guest shall ensure that the minibar is locked and that access to the minibar is restricted to guests of legal drinking age.

The holder of a first-class license may permit a customer to:

possess or carry no more than two open containers of alcoholic beverages; and

maintain control over his or her open container of alcoholic beverages at all times while on the licensed premises.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 83

, § 34; amended

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 37;

2019, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 13, 2020.

§ 222.
Second-class licenses.

With the approval of the Board of Liquor and Lottery, the control commissioners may grant a second-class license to a retail dealer for the premises where the dealer carries on business if the retail dealer submits an application and pays the fee provided in section 204 of this title and satisfies the Board that the premises:
(a) (1) With the approval of the Board of Liquor and Lottery, the control commissioners may grant a second-class license to a retail dealer for the premises where the dealer carries on business if the retail dealer submits an application and pays the fee provided in section 204 of this title and satisfies the Board that the premises:

are leased, rented, or owned by the retail dealer; and

are a safe, sanitary, and proper place from which to sell malt and vinous beverages.

The Division shall post notice of pending applications on its website.

A second-class license permits the holder to export malt and vinous beverages and to sell malt and vinous beverages to the public from the licensed premises for consumption off the premises.
(b) (1) A second-class license permits the holder to export malt and vinous beverages and to sell malt and vinous beverages to the public from the licensed premises for consumption off the premises.

The Division of Liquor Control may grant a second-class licensee a fortified wine permit pursuant to section 225 of this chapter or a retail delivery permit pursuant to section 226 of this chapter.

Except as otherwise provided pursuant to sections 225, 271, and 278 of this title, a second-class license holder shall purchase all malt beverages and vinous beverages sold pursuant to its license from Vermont wholesale dealers or packagers.

A retail dealer carrying on business in more than one place shall be required to acquire a second-class license for each place where the retail dealer sells malt and vinous beverages.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 90

, § 2;

1985, No. 99

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1985, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1987, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.);

1993, No. 11

, § 2, eff. April 27, 1993;

1999, No. 39

, § 1;

2009, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 11, 2010;

2011, No. 52

, § 60, eff. May 27, 2011;

2011, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 1a;

2013, No. 64

, § 3;

2013, No. 202

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. June 24, 2014;

2015, No. 51

, § A.9, eff. Jan. 1, 2016;

2015, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2017, No. 83

, § 35;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 38.

§ 223.
Third-class licenses.

The Board of Liquor and Lottery may grant to a person who operates a hotel, restaurant, club, boat, or railroad dining car, or who holds a manufacturer’s or rectifier’s license, a third-class license if:

the person files an application accompanied by the fee provided in section 204 of this title for the premises in which the business of the hotel, restaurant, club, or manufacturer or rectifier is carried on or for the boat or railroad dining car;

the local control commissioners have approved the application; and

the applicant satisfies the Board that:

the applicant is the bona fide owner or lessee of the premises, boat, or railroad dining car;

except in the case of clubs or holders of a manufacturer’s or rectifier’s license, the premises, boat, or railroad dining car has adequate and sanitary space and equipment for preparing and serving meals to the public; and

the premises, boat, or railroad dining car is operated for the purpose covered by the license.

A third-class license holder may sell spirits and fortified wines for consumption only on the licensed premises, boat, or railroad dining car.

The holder of a third-class license may permit a customer to:

possess or carry no more than two open containers of alcoholic beverages; and

maintain control over his or her open container of alcoholic beverages at all times while on the licensed premises, boat, or railroad dining car.

Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (2) and (3) of this subsection, a person who holds a third-class license shall purchase from the Board of Liquor and Lottery all spirits and fortified wines dispensed in accordance with the provisions of the third-class license and this title.
(d) (1) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (2) and (3) of this subsection, a person who holds a third-class license shall purchase from the Board of Liquor and Lottery all spirits and fortified wines dispensed in accordance with the provisions of the third-class license and this title.

For a third-class license issued for a dining car or boat, the licensee may procure outside the State of Vermont spirits and fortified wines that are sold pursuant to the license.

For a third-class license that is issued to a licensed manufacturer or rectifier of spirits or fortified wines, the licensee shall not be required to purchase from the Board of Liquor and Lottery spirits and fortified wines that it has manufactured or rectified before selling them pursuant to its third-class license.

No person under 18 years of age shall be employed by a third-class licensee as:

a bartender for the purpose of preparing, mixing, or dispensing alcoholic beverages; or

a waitress or waiter for the purpose of serving alcoholic beverages.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 90

, § 3;

2003, No. 79

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2005, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 9, 2006;

2015, No. 51

, § A.10, eff. Jan. 1, 2016;

2015, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2017, No. 83

, § 36;

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 39;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 39;

2019, No. 73

, § 46;

2019, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. July 13, 2020.

§ 224.
Fourth-class licenses.

The Board of Liquor and Lottery may grant up to a combined total of ten fourth-class licenses to a manufacturer or rectifier that submits an application and the fee provided in section 204 of this title.

At each licensed location, a fourth-class licensee may sell by the unopened container or distribute by the glass, with or without charge, alcoholic beverages manufactured by the licensee.

A licensee may, for consumption at the licensed premises or location, distribute the following amounts of alcoholic beverages to a retail customer:

no more than two ounces of malt beverages or vinous beverages with a total of eight ounces; and

no more than one-quarter ounce of spirits or fortified wine with a total of one ounce.

At a fourth-class license location at the licensee’s manufacturing premises, the licensee may distribute by the glass up to four mixed drinks containing a combined total of no more than one ounce of spirits or fortified wine to each retail customer for consumption only on the licensed premises.

At each licensed location, a fourth-class licensee may, pursuant to section 64 of this title, sell malt beverages or vinous beverages, or both, by the keg.

At only one fourth-class license location, a licensed manufacturer or rectifier may sell by the unopened container or distribute by the glass, with or without charge, alcoholic beverages produced by no more than five additional manufacturers or rectifiers, provided these beverages are purchased on invoice from the manufacturer or rectifier.
(c) (1) At only one fourth-class license location, a licensed manufacturer or rectifier may sell by the unopened container or distribute by the glass, with or without charge, alcoholic beverages produced by no more than five additional manufacturers or rectifiers, provided these beverages are purchased on invoice from the manufacturer or rectifier.

A manufacturer or rectifier may sell its product to no more than five additional manufacturers or rectifiers.

A fourth-class license issued for a farmers’ market location shall be valid for all dates of operation for the specific farmers’ market location.

Rules applicable to second-class licenses and pertaining to financial responsibility, age of employees, the selling and furnishing to apparently intoxicated persons; and leases of businesses shall all apply to fourth-class licenses.

Signs and advertising of fourth-class licenses at tasting rooms and retail shops other than at the manufacturer’s or rectifier’s premises shall indicate that the premises are a “tasting room and retail shop,” and shall be in lettering not less than 75 percent of the height and width of the lettering setting forth the name of the licensee or establishment.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 112

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Feb. 18, 1994; amended

2017, No. 83

, § 37;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 40.

§ 225.
Fortified wine permits.

The Division of Liquor Control may grant a fortified wine permit to a second-class licensee if the licensee files an application accompanied by the fee provided in section 204 of this title.
(a) (1) The Division of Liquor Control may grant a fortified wine permit to a second-class licensee if the licensee files an application accompanied by the fee provided in section 204 of this title.

The Division of Liquor Control shall issue not more than 150 fortified wine permits in any single year.

A fortified wine permit holder may sell fortified wines to the public from the licensed premises for consumption off the premises.
(b) (1) A fortified wine permit holder may sell fortified wines to the public from the licensed premises for consumption off the premises.

A fortified wine permit holder shall purchase all fortified wines to be offered for sale to the public pursuant to the permit through the Board of Liquor and Lottery at a price equal to not more than 75 percent of the current retail price for the fortified wine established by the Commissioner pursuant to subdivision 107(3)(B) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 83

, § 39; amended

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 41.

§ 226.
Retail delivery permits.

The Division of Liquor Control may grant a retail delivery permit to a second-class licensee if the licensee files an application accompanied by the fee provided in section 204 of this title.
(a) (1) The Division of Liquor Control may grant a retail delivery permit to a second-class licensee if the licensee files an application accompanied by the fee provided in section 204 of this title.

Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, the Division of Liquor Control shall not grant a retail delivery permit in relation to a second-class license issued to a licensed manufacturer or rectifier for the manufacturer’s or rectifier’s premises.

A retail delivery permit holder may deliver malt beverages and vinous beverages sold from the licensed premises for consumption off the premises to an individual who is 21 years of age or older subject to the following requirements:

Deliveries shall only be made by the permit holder or an employee of the permit holder.

Deliveries shall only occur between the hours of 9:00 a.m. and 5:00 p.m.

Deliveries shall only be made to a physical address located in Vermont.

An employee of a retail delivery permit holder shall not be permitted to make deliveries of malt beverages or vinous beverages pursuant to the permit unless he or she has completed a training program approved by the Division pursuant to section 213 of this chapter.

Malt beverages and vinous beverages delivered pursuant to a retail delivery permit shall be for personal use and not for resale.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 83

, § 41; amended

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 42.

§ 227.
Outside consumption permits; first-, third-, and fourth-class licenses.

Pursuant to the rules of the Board of Liquor and Lottery, the Division of Liquor Control may grant an outside consumption permit to the holder of a first-class, first- and third-class, or fourth-class license for all or part of the outside premises of the license holder if the permit is approved by the local control commissioners and the Board.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 181

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 11, 1994; amended

1997, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2011, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2017, No. 83

, § 44;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 43.

§ 228.
Sampler flights.

The holder of a first-class license may serve a sampler flight of up to 32 ounces in the aggregate of malt beverages to a single customer at one time.

The holder of a first-class license may serve a sampler flight of up to 12 ounces in the aggregate of vinous beverages to a single customer at one time.

The holder of a third-class license may serve a sampler flight of up to four ounces in the aggregate of spirits or fortified wines to a single customer at one time.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 83

, § 45.

§ 229.
Clubs.

Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (2) and (3) of this subsection, a club shall be permitted to obtain a license under this title if it has existed for at least two consecutive years prior to the date of its application.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (2) and (3) of this subsection, a club shall be permitted to obtain a license under this title if it has existed for at least two consecutive years prior to the date of its application.

A club whose officers and members consist solely of veterans of the U.S. Armed Forces or a subordinate lodge or local chapter of any national fraternal order, which fulfills all requirements of this section except that it has not been in existence for at least two consecutive years, shall be permitted to obtain a license under this title if it has existed for at least six months prior to the date of its application.

A club that is located on and integrally associated with at least a regulation nine-hole golf course shall be permitted to obtain a license under this title if it has existed for at least six months prior to the date of its application.

The premises of a club that is licensed pursuant to this title may be used or leased by a nonmember as a location for a social event as if it were any other licensed commercial establishment.

Before May 1 of each year, each club shall file with the Board of Liquor and Lottery a list of the names and residences of its members and a list of its officers.
(c) (1) Before May 1 of each year, each club shall file with the Board of Liquor and Lottery a list of the names and residences of its members and a list of its officers.

Its affairs and management shall be conducted by a board of directors, executive committee, or similar body chosen by the members at its annual meeting.

A club may provide for a salary for members, officers, agents, or employees of the club by a vote at annual meetings by the club’s members, directors, or other governing body, and shall report the salary set for the members, officers, agents, or employees to the Board of Liquor and Lottery.
(3) (A) A club may provide for a salary for members, officers, agents, or employees of the club by a vote at annual meetings by the club’s members, directors, or other governing body, and shall report the salary set for the members, officers, agents, or employees to the Board of Liquor and Lottery.

No member, officer, agent, or employee of a club shall be paid, or directly or indirectly receive, in the form of salary or other compensation, any profits from the disposition or sale of alcoholic beverages to the club’s members or guests introduced by members beyond the amount of any salary that may be fixed and voted pursuant to subdivision (A) of this subdivision (3).

An auxiliary member of a club may invite one guest at any one time.

An officer or director of a club may perform the duties of a bartender without receiving any payment for that service, provided the officer or director is in compliance with the requirements of this title that relate to service of alcoholic beverages.
(5) (A) An officer or director of a club may perform the duties of a bartender without receiving any payment for that service, provided the officer or director is in compliance with the requirements of this title that relate to service of alcoholic beverages.

An officer, member, or director of a club may volunteer to perform services at the club other than serving alcoholic beverages, including seating patrons and checking identification, without receiving payment for those services.

An officer, member, or director of a club who volunteers his or her services shall not be considered to be an employee of the club.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 83

, § 46;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 44.

§ 230. Section 230 repealed effective July 1, 2023. Sale of alcoholic beverages for off-premises consumption.

The Board of Liquor and Lottery and the local control commissioners may authorize:

First- and third-class licensees to sell malt beverages, vinous beverages, and spirits-based prepared drinks for off-premises consumption. All sales of alcoholic beverages for off-premises consumption must be accompanied by a food order.

Second-class licensees to provide curbside pickup of unopened containers of the alcoholic beverages that the licensee is permitted to sell from the licensed premises pursuant to section 222 of this subchapter.

Fourth-class licensees to provide curbside pickup of unopened containers of the alcoholic beverages that the licensee is permitted to sell from the licensed location pursuant to section 224 of this subchapter.

For any alcoholic beverage sold pursuant to subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the first- or third-class licensee shall provide the alcoholic beverage in a container:

with a securely affixed tamper-evident seal; and

bearing a label that:

states that the beverage contains alcohol; and

lists the ingredients and serving size.

A licensee may sell alcoholic beverages pursuant to this section between 10:00 a.m. and 11:00 p.m.

The Board of Liquor and Lottery may adopt rules and forms necessary to implement this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 70

, § 2.

§ 231.
Redesignated. 2017, No. 83, § 23.

§ 232.
Redesignated. 2017, No. 83, § 24.

§ 233.
Redesignated. 2017, No. 83, § 25.

§ 234.
Redesignated. 2017, No. 83, § 26.

§ 235.
Redesignated. 2017, No. 83, § 28.

§ 236.
Redesignated. 2017, No. 83, § 29.

§ 236a.
Redesignated. 2017, No. 83, § 30.

§ 237.
Redesignated. 2017, No. 83, § 31.

§ 238.
Redesignated. 2017, No. 83, § 47.

§ 238a.
Redesignated. 2017, No. 83, § 44.

§ 239.
Redesignated. 2017, No. 83, § 32.

§ 240.
Redesignated. 2017, No. 83, § 33.